Washington statutes.
RCW 41.50.800

Apportionment of budgeted funds of affected agencies.

If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers herein authorized, the director of financial management shall certify such apportionments to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustment in funds and appropriation accounts and equipment records in accordance with such certification.

[ 1979 c 151 s 64; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 105 s 13.]